Utah statutes.
53A-20-108.   Notification to local government of intent to purchase school site or construction of school building -- Negotiation of fees -- Confidentiality.

(1) (a)  A school district or charter school shall notify the affected local governmental entity without delay prior to the purchase of a school site or construction of a school building of its intent to purchase or construct.

(b)  Representatives of the local governmental entity and the school district or charter school shall meet as soon as possible after delivery of the notice under Subsection (1)(a) to:

(i)  discuss concerns that each may have, including potential community impacts and site safety;

(ii)  assess the availability of infrastructure for the site; and

(iii)  discuss any fees that might be charged by the local governmental entity in connection with a building project.

(2)  Representatives of the local governmental entity and the school district or charter school shall meet as soon as possible after the purchase of a school site to discuss concerns that each may have, including potential community impacts, and to negotiate any fees that might be charged by the local governmental entity in connection with a building project.

(3)  A local governmental entity may not increase a previously agreed-upon fee after the district or charter school has signed contracts to begin construction.

(4)  Prior to the filing of a formal application by the affected school district or charter school, a local governmental entity may not disclose information obtained from a school district or charter school regarding the district's or charter school's consideration of, or intent to, purchase a school site or construct a school building, without first obtaining the consent of the district or charter school.



Amended by Chapter 7, 2005 General Session

